tests/wiki.yaml
  "Сӑмах класс":
    класс<n><nom> :  класс 
    класс<n><gen> :  класӑн 
    класс<n><dat> :  класа 
    класс<n><loc> :  класра 
    класс<n><abl> :  класран 
    класс<n><ins> :  класпа 
    класс<n><abe> :  классӑр 
    класс<n><ben> :  класшӑн
    класс<n><px1sg><nom> :  класӑм 
    класс<n><px1sg><gen> :  класӑмӑн 
    класс<n><px1sg><dat> :  класӑма 
    класс<n><px1sg><loc> :  класӑмра 
    класс<n><px1sg><abl> :  класӑмран 
    класс<n><px1sg><ins> :  класӑмпа 
    класс<n><px1sg><abe> :  класӑмсӑр 
    класс<n><px1sg><ben> :  класӑмшӑн
    класс<n><px2sg><nom> :  класу 
    класс<n><px2sg><gen> :  класун 
    класс<n><px2sg><dat> :  класна
    класс<n><px2sg><loc> :  класунта 
    класс<n><px2sg><abl> :  класунтан 
    класс<n><px2sg><ins> :  класупа 
    класс<n><px2sg><abe> :  класусӑр 
    класс<n><px2sg><ben> :  класушӑн
    класс<n><px3sp><nom> :  класӗ 
    класс<n><px3sp><gen> :  класӗн 
    класс<n><px3sp><dat> :  класне 
    класс<n><px3sp><loc> :  класӗнче 
    класс<n><px3sp><abl> :  класӗнчен 
    класс<n><px3sp><ins> :  класӗпе 
    класс<n><px3sp><abe> :  класӗсӗр 
    класс<n><px3sp><ben> :  класӗшӗн
    класс<n><px1pl><nom> :  класӑмӑр 
    класс<n><px1pl><gen> :  класӑмӑрӑн 
    класс<n><px1pl><dat> :  класӑмӑра 
    класс<n><px1pl><loc> :  класӑмӑрта 
    класс<n><px1pl><abl> :  класӑмӑртан 
    класс<n><px1pl><ins> :  класӑмӑрпа 
    класс<n><px1pl><abe> :  класӑмӑрсӑр 
    класс<n><px1pl><ben> :  класӑмӑршӑн
    класс<n><px2pl><nom> :  класӑр 
    класс<n><px2pl><gen> :  класӑрӑн 
    класс<n><px2pl><dat> :  класӑра 
    класс<n><px2pl><loc> :  класӑрта 
    класс<n><px2pl><abl> :  класӑртан 
    класс<n><px2pl><ins> :  класӑрпа 
    класс<n><px2pl><abe> :  класӑрсӑр 
    класс<n><px2pl><ben> :  класӑршӑн
    класс<n><pl><nom> :  классем 
    класс<n><pl><gen> :  классен 
    класс<n><pl><dat> :  классене 
    класс<n><pl><loc> :  классенче 
    класс<n><pl><abl> :  классенчен 
    класс<n><pl><ins> :  классемпе 
    класс<n><pl><abe> :  классемсӗр 
    класс<n><pl><ben> :  классемшӗн
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  класӑмсем 
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  класӑмсен 
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  класӑмсене 
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  класӑмсенче 
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  класӑмсенчен 
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  класӑмсемпе 
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  класӑмсемсӗр 
    класс<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  класӑмсемшӗн
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  класусем 
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  класусен 
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  класусене 
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  класусенче 
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  класусенчен 
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  класусемпе 
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  класусемсӗр 
    класс<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  класусемшӗн
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  класӗсем 
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  класӗсен 
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  класӗсене 
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  класӗсенче 
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  класӗсенчен 
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  класӗсемпе 
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  класӗсемсӗр 
    класс<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  класӗсемшӗн
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  класӑмӑрсем 
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  класӑмӑрсен 
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  класӑмӑрсене 
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  класӑмӑрсенче 
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  класӑмӑрсенчен 
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  класӑмӑрсемпе 
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  класӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    класс<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  класӑмӑрсемшӗн
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  класӑрсем 
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  класӑрсен 
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  класӑрсене 
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  класӑрсенче 
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  класӑрсенчен 
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  класӑрсемпе 
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  класӑрсемсӗр 
    класс<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  класӑрсемшӗн

  "Сӑмах контролёр":
    контролёр<n><nom> :  контролёр 
    контролёр<n><gen> :  контролёрӑн 
    контролёр<n><dat> :  контролёра 
    контролёр<n><loc> :  контролёрта 
    контролёр<n><abl> : контролёртан 
    контролёр<n><ins> :  контролёрпа 
    контролёр<n><abe> :  контролёрсӑр 
    контролёр<n><ben> :  контролёршӑн
    контролёр<n><px1sg><nom> :  контролёрӑм 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><gen> :  контролёрӑмӑн 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><dat> :  контролёрӑма 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><loc> :  контролёрӑмра 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><abl> :  контролёрӑмран 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><ins> :  контролёрӑмпа 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><abe> :  контролёрӑмсӑр 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><ben> :  контролёрӑмшӑн
    контролёр<n><px2sg><nom> :  контролёру 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><gen> :  контролёрун 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><dat> :  контролёрна 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><loc> :  контролёрунта 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><abl> :  контролёрунтан 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><ins> :  контролёрупа 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><abe> :  контролёрусӑр 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><ben> :  контролёрушӑн
    контролёр<n><px3sp><nom> :  контролёрӗ 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><gen> :  контролёрӗн 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><dat> :  контролёрне 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><loc> :  контролёрӗнче 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><abl> :  контролёрӗнчен 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><ins> :  контролёрӗпе 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><abe> :  контролёрӗсӗр 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><ben> :  контролёрӗшӗн
    контролёр<n><px1pl><nom> :  контролёрӑмӑр 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><gen> :  контролёрӑмӑрӑн 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><dat> :  контролёрӑмӑра 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><loc> :  контролёрӑмӑрта 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><abl> :  контролёрӑмӑртан 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><ins> :  контролёрӑмӑрпа 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><abe> :  контролёрӑмӑрсӑр 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><ben> :  контролёрӑмӑршӑн
    контролёр<n><px2pl><nom> :  контролёрӑр 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><gen> :  контролёрӑрӑн 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><dat> :  контролёрӑра 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><loc> :  контролёрӑрта 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><abl> :  контролёрӑртан 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><ins> :  контролёрӑрпа 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><abe> :  контролёрӑрсӑр 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><ben> :  контролёрӑршӑн
    контролёр<n><pl><nom> :  контролёрсем 
    контролёр<n><pl><gen> :  контролёрсен 
    контролёр<n><pl><dat> :  контролёрсене 
    контролёр<n><pl><loc> :  контролёрсенче 
    контролёр<n><pl><abl> :  контролёрсенчен 
    контролёр<n><pl><ins> :  контролёрсемпе 
    контролёр<n><pl><abe> :  контролёрсемсӗр 
    контролёр<n><pl><ben> :  контролёрсемшӗн
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  контролёрӑмсем 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  контролёрӑмсен 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  контролёрӑмсене 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  контролёрӑмсенче 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  контролёрӑмсенчен 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  контролёрӑмсемпе 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  контролёрӑмсемсӗр 
    контролёр<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  контролёрӑмсемшӗн
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  контролёрусем 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  контролёрусен 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  контролёрусене 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  контролёрусенче 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  контролёрусенчен 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  контролёрусемпе 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  контролёрусемсӗр 
    контролёр<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  контролёрусемшӗн
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  контролёрӗсем 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  контролёрӗсен 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  контролёрӗсене 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  контролёрӗсенче 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  контролёрӗсенчен 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  контролёрӗсемпе 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  контролёрӗсемсӗр 
    контролёр<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  контролёрӗсемшӗн
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  контролёрӑмӑрсем 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  контролёрӑмӑрсен 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  контролёрӑмӑрсене 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  контролёрӑмӑрсенче 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  контролёрӑмӑрсенчен 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  контролёрӑмӑрсемпе 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  контролёрӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    контролёр<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  контролёрӑмӑрсемшӗн
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  контролёрӑрсем 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  контролёрӑрсен 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  контролёрӑрсене 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  контролёрӑрсенче 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  контролёрӑрсенчен 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  контролёрӑрсемпе 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  контролёрӑрсемсӗр 
    контролёр<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  контролёрӑрсемшӗн
